Arkansas, session 2025, HB1009.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 77, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-77-154. Presumptive eligibility for pregnant women.
(a) The Arkansas Medicaid Program shall make presumptive eligibility
determinations for pregnant women who are applying for the program to improve
access to prenatal care and to allow prenatal care to be delivered
immediately while waiting for a full program application to be processed.
(b) The program may designate one (1) or more qualified entities to
screen for eligibility and immediately enroll pregnant women into the
program.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 21, Chapter 5, Subchapter 4, is amended
*ANS045*
01-16-2025 13:10:41 ANS045

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1009
to add an additional section to read as follows:
21-5-425. Pregnancy — Qualifying event.
An employee or a dependent of an employee who previously declined
enrollment in the State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program
is eligible to enroll in the program as a result of pregnancy as a qualifying
event.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 85, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
23-85-141. Pregnancy — Qualifying event.
An insurer issuing or renewing a policy under this chapter shall allow
an individual to enroll in the policy as a result of pregnancy as a
qualifying event.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 86, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
23-86-124. Pregnancy — Qualifying event.
An insurer issuing or renewing a policy under this chapter shall allow
an individual to enroll in the policy as a result of pregnancy as a
qualifying event.

SECTION 5. DO NOT CODIFY. EFFECTIVE DATE. This act is effective on
and after January 1, 2026.

/s/A. Collins











01-16-2025 13:10:41 ANS045